Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-392
Skilled nursing care; intermediate care; facilities; establish; operate; administered; license.

The department may establish, operate, and administer skilled nursing care and intermediate care facilities. No such facility shall be established, operated, or administered without having complied with the laws, rules, and regulations establishing standards for construction, maintenance, and operation of such facilities and the care of persons in such facilities, and no such facility shall be established, operated, or administered without a license pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act.

Laws 1973, LB 536, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 159.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.